Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.053, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Requirement. Except as provided in section 85.054, a motor vehicle may not enter a state park, state recreation area, or state wayside over 50 acres in area, without a state park permit issued under this sectionnew text begin , a valid outdoor recreation endorsement sticker affixed to a license plate issued under section 168.371,new text end or a state parks and trails plate issued under section 168.1295. Except for vehicles permitted under subdivisions 7, paragraph (a), clause (2), and 8, the state park permit must be affixed to the lower right corner windshield of the motor vehicle and must be completely affixed by its own adhesive to the windshield, or the commissioner may, by written order, provide an alternative means to display and validate state park permits. A motor vehicle owner or lessee is responsible for ensuring the owner's or lessee's vehicle has a state park permit, and the commissioner may issue warnings and citations under section 84.0835 to the owner or lessee of a vehicle not in compliance. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [85.057] OUTDOOR RECREATION ENDORSEMENT ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin The outdoor recreation endorsement account is established in the natural resources fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Revenue deposited and appropriation. new text end new text begin Revenue collected under section 168.371 must be deposited in the natural resources fund and credited to the outdoor recreation endorsement account. Money in the account is available for appropriation to the commissioner of natural resources to operate and maintain the state park system and other units of the state outdoor recreation system. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.002, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21c. new text end new text begin Outdoor recreation endorsement. new text end new text begin "Outdoor recreation endorsement" means the outdoor recreation license plate endorsement established under section 168.371. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.012, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Vehicles registered by certain veterans. (a) A passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle registered by a veteran with a total service-connected disability, as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 51, is not subject to: (1) registration taxes under this chapter; (2) administrative fees imposed under subdivision 1c; (3) filing fees and surcharges imposed under section 168.33, subdivision 7; or (4) plate and validation sticker fees imposed under this chapter, including but not limited to: (i) fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5; (ii) new text begin the fee required for an outdoor recreation endorsement under section 168.371, subdivision 3;new text end new text begin (iii) new text end fees identified in any section authorizing special plates; and deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end transfer fees. (b) The exemptions under this subdivision apply to a motor vehicle that is jointly registered by a qualifying veteran and a spouse or domestic partner. (c) The fees identified under paragraph (a), clause (4), do not include: (1) a fee for personalized plates under section 168.12, subdivision 2a; or (2) a required contribution or donation for a special plate, including but not limited to a contribution under sections 168.1255, subdivision 1, clause (6); 168.1258, subdivision 1, clause (4); 168.1259, subdivision 2,new text begin paragraph (a),new text end clause (5); 168.1287, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.129, subdivision 1, clause (5); 168.1295, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); 168.1296, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); and 168.1299, subdivision 1, clause (3). (d) A qualifying veteran may register no more than two motor vehicles at the same time with the exemptions under this subdivision. Nothing in this paragraph prevents registration of additional motor vehicles as otherwise provided in this chapter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.0135, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorization. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with deputy registrars, must establish a process to implement, locate, and install self-service kiosks that may be used for passenger vehicle and motorcycle registration renewals. The commissioner must establish reasonable performance, security, technical, and financial standards to approve a vendor. Self-service kiosks authorized by this section must: (1) allow a customer to renew a passenger vehicle or motorcycle registration pursuant to section 168.013 without assistance of a deputy registrar; (2) collect the appropriate annual contribution for a special license plate; (3) process requests for duplicate license plates, except that the self-service kiosk must not process any request for a special plate that requires documentation to prove eligibility to receive that type of plate; new text begin (4) process and dispense outdoor recreation endorsement stickers to the applicant at the time of application; new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end dispense license plate registration renewal stickers to the applicant at the time of the application; and deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end display the contact phone number and email address of the deputy registrar's office that is responsible for the self-service kiosk. (b) This section only applies to deputy registrars appointed pursuant to section 168.33, subdivision 2. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.09, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Display of temporary permit. (a) The commissioner may issue a temporary permit under this subdivision in conjunction with the conclusion of a registration period or a recently expired registration if: (1) the current registration tax and all other fees and taxes have been paid in full; and (2) special plates have been applied for. (b) The permit is valid for a period of 60 days. The permit must be in a format prescribed by the commissioner, affixed to the rear of the vehicle where a license plate would normally be affixed, and plainly visible. new text begin If the registration includes payment for the fee required for an outdoor recreation endorsement, the commissioner must include the endorsement on the temporary permit. new text end The permit is valid only for the vehicle for which it was issued to allow a reasonable time for the new plates to be manufactured and delivered to the applicant. The permit may be issued only by the commissioner or by a deputy registrar under section 168.33. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Plates; design, visibility, periods of issuance. (a) The commissioner, upon approval and payment, must issue to the applicant the plates required by this chapter, bearing the state name and an assigned vehicle registration number. The number assigned by the commissioner may be a combination of a letter or sign with figures. The color of the plates and the color of the abbreviation of the state name and the number assigned must be in marked contrast. The plates must be lettered, spaced, or distinguished to suitably indicate the registration of the vehicle according to the rules of the commissioner. (b) When a vehicle is registered on the basis of total gross weight, the plates issued must clearly indicate by letters or other suitable insignia the maximum gross weight for which the tax has been paid. (c) Plates issued to a noncommercial vehicle must bear the inscription "noncommercial" unless the vehicle is displaying a special plate authorized and issued under this chapter. (d) A one-ton pickup truck that is used for commercial purposes and is subject to section 168.185, is eligible to display special plates as authorized and issued under this chapter. (e) The plates must be so treated as to be at least 100 times brighter than the conventional painted number plates. When properly mounted on an unlighted vehicle, the plates, when viewed from a vehicle equipped with standard headlights, must be visible for a distance of not less than 1,500 feet and readable for a distance of not less than 110 feet. (f) The commissioner must issue plates for the following periods: (1) new plates issued pursuant to section 168.012, subdivision 1, must be issued to a vehicle for as long as the vehicle is owned by the exempt agency and the plate is not transferable from one vehicle to another but the plate may be transferred with the vehicle from one tax-exempt agency to anotherdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) plates issued for passenger automobiles must be issued for a seven-year period. All plates issued under this paragraph must be replaced if they are seven years old or older at the time of registration renewal or will become so during the registration perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) plates issued under sections 168.053 and 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17, must be for a seven-year perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (4) plates issued under subdivisions 2c and 2d and sections 168.123, 168.1235, and 168.1255 must be issued for the life of the veteran under section 169.79deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end (5) plates for any vehicle not specified in clauses (1) to (3) must be issued for the life of the vehicle. (g) In a year in which plates are not issued, the commissioner must issue for each registration a sticker to designate the year of registration. This sticker must show the year or years for which the sticker is issued, and is valid only for that period. The plates and stickers issued for a vehicle may not be transferred to another vehicle during the period for which the sticker is issued, except when issued for a vehicle registered under section 168.187. (h) Despite any other provision of this subdivision, plates issued to a vehicle used for behind-the-wheel instruction in a driver education course in a public school may be transferred to another vehicle used for the same purpose without payment of any additional fee. The public school must notify the commissioner of each transfer of plates under this paragraph. The commissioner may prescribe a format for notification. (i) In lieu of plates required under this section, the commissioner must issue a registration number identical to the federally issued tail number assigned to a roadable aircraft. new text begin (j) Upon the issuance of new plates for a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle or in a year in which plates are not issued and stickers are issued under paragraph (g), the commissioner must offer to each applicant the ability to select an outdoor recreation endorsement under section 168.371 and receive an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker. The application and payment of the required fee for an outdoor recreation endorsement must be made at the time of registration. The outdoor recreation endorsement sticker may not be transferred to another vehicle during the period for which the sticker is issued. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for license plates issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Additional fee. (a) In addition to any fee otherwise authorized or any tax otherwise imposed upon any vehicle, the payment of which is required as a condition to the issuance of any plate or plates, the commissioner shall impose the fee specified in paragraph (b) that is calculated to cover the cost of manufacturing and issuing the plate or plates, except for plates issued to disabled veterans as defined in section 168.031 and plates issued pursuant to section 168.124, 168.125, or 168.27, subdivisions 16 and 17, for passenger automobiles. The commissioner shall issue graphic design plates only for vehicles registered pursuant to section 168.017 and recreational vehicles registered pursuant to section 168.013, subdivision 1g. (b) Unless otherwise specified or exempted by statute, the following plate and validation sticker fees apply for the original, duplicate, or replacement issuance of a plate in a plate year: License Plate Single Double Regular and Disability $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Special $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Personalized (Replacement) $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Collector Category $ 13.50 $ 15.50 Emergency Vehicle Display $ 3.00 $ 6.00 Utility Trailer Self-Adhesive $ 2.50 Vertical Motorcycle Plate $ 100.00 NA Replacement Dealer Plates $ 5.25 Replacement Tax Exempt Plates $ 5.25 Stickers Duplicate year $ 1.50 $ 1.50 new text begin Duplicate Outdoor Recreation Endorsement new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3.00 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3.00 new text end International Fuel Tax Agreement $ 2.50 (c) For vehicles that require two of the categories in paragraph (b), the registrar shall only charge the higher of the two fees and not a combined total. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.27, subdivision 28, is amended to read: Subd. 28. Distribution of plates and stickers. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may distribute registration plates and stickers to be held and issued by new and used motor vehicle dealers. A dealer may issue registration plates and stickers only in conjunction with the sale of a vehicle by the dealer. A dealer permitted to hold and issue registration plates and stickers must be equipped with electronic transmission technology and trained in its use. Before receiving registration plates and stickers under this subdivision, a dealer must adopt and implement security and record-keeping requirements satisfactory to the commissioner. The commissioner may revoke the authority granted under this subdivision for any violation of law or rule governing the issuance of registration plates and stickers, any violation of the dealer's security and record-keeping plan, or any other action that in the commissioner's opinion adversely affects the registration system. The dealer is financially responsible for the cost and tax value of any unaccounted inventory. new text begin (b) The commissioner, in coordination with the commissioner of natural resources, must provide information to new and used motor vehicle dealers about the outdoor recreation endorsement established in section 168.371. The commissioner may distribute outdoor recreation endorsement stickers to be held by the dealer under the security and record-keeping requirements for registration plates and stickers in paragraph (a). Upon successful application for the endorsement by the vehicle's purchaser and payment of the required fee, a dealer may distribute an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker upon the sale of a vehicle and registration in this state along with the registration plates and stickers specified in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.29, is amended to read: 168.29 REPLACEMENT PLATES. (a) In the event of the defacement, loss, or destruction of any number plates deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end validation stickers, new text begin or, where applicable, an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker, new text end the commissioner, upon receiving and filing a sworn statement of the vehicle owner, setting forth the circumstances of the defacement, loss, destruction, or theft of the number plates or validation stickers, together with any defaced plates or stickers and the payment of a fee calculated to cover the cost of replacement, must issue a new set of plates or stickers. (b) A licensed motor vehicle dealer may only apply for replacement plates upon application for a certificate of title in the name of a new owner or the dealer. The commissioner must issue a new set of plates or validation stickers upon application for title and registration after removal of plates pursuant to section 168A.11, subdivision 2. (c) Plates issued under this section are subject to section 168.12 (d) The commissioner must note on the commissioner's records the issue of new number plates and must attempt to cancel and call in the original plates so as to insure against their use on another motor vehicle. (e) Duplicate registration certificates plainly marked as duplicates may be issued in like cases upon the payment of a $1 fee. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [168.371] OUTDOOR RECREATION ENDORSEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicant" means an owner applying for registration plates and validation stickers for an eligible vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) "Yearly registration sticker" means license plate registration renewal stickers issued to a driver that displays the year the vehicle was registered in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment; issuance. new text end new text begin (a) An outdoor recreation endorsement is established to authorize motor vehicle entry into all state parks, state recreation areas, and state waysides larger than 50 acres in area. The endorsement must be offered to an applicant upon registration or the annual renewal registration of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 27, and the issuance of a new set of license plates or validation stickers. The endorsement must be located on the yearly validation sticker affixed to a vehicle's license plate. The registration sticker must meet the design and color requirements specified in subdivision 4. The outdoor recreation endorsement is subject to the filing fee for vehicle registration transactions under section 168.33, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must issue an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (3) pays the amount specified in subdivision 3 to the outdoor recreation endorsement account in section 85.057; and new text end new text begin (4) pays all applicable fees for license plates or, if applicable, special plates required by this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must modify the format and language of an application for motor vehicle registration or the renewal application of a motor vehicle's registration to include the option to purchase the outdoor recreation endorsement. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner, in coordination with the commissioner of natural resources, must provide access to information on the outdoor recreation endorsement at the time of registration or renewal, including: new text end new text begin (1) identifying the outdoor recreation endorsement as optional; new text end new text begin (2) the endorsement's benefits, including the use of and access to all state parks, recreation areas, and waysides larger than 50 acres; new text end new text begin (3) the cost differences between the fees for a state parks permit under section 85.055, subdivision 1, and a state parks and trails special license plate under section 168.1295 versus the outdoor recreation endorsement; new text end new text begin (4) the individuals eligible for a free annual state parks permit; and new text end new text begin (5) the vehicles eligible to receive the endorsement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fee. new text end new text begin The amount of the outdoor recreation endorsement is as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for registrations or renewals between January 1, 2027, and December 31, 2028, $15; new text end new text begin (2) for registrations or renewals between January 1, 2029, and December 31, 2030, $17; and new text end new text begin (3) for registrations or renewals on or after January 1, 2031, $19. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Sticker. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, must create a suitable design for the outdoor recreation endorsement registration sticker. The size of and the information contained on an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker must be substantively identical to a yearly registration sticker issued to a motor vehicle. The outdoor recreation endorsement sticker must be made a distinctive and separate color from the standard vehicle yearly registration sticker and must not use a color chosen for the yearly registration sticker within the prior three years. The outdoor recreation endorsement registration sticker must include a graphical indicator of the outdoor recreation endorsement and the year for which it is valid. The graphical indicator must be designed to allow for ready identification of whether an outdoor recreation endorsement has been paid for a motor vehicle. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use; exempt vehicles; transfer not permitted. new text end new text begin (a) The endorsement provides the same rights of access and entry as a state park permit as provided in section 85.053, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The following motor vehicles are not eligible to apply for or receive an outdoor recreation endorsement: new text end new text begin (1) vehicles exempt from registration tax or license fees under section 168.012, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) vehicles issued a dealer plate under section 168.27, subdivision 16; new text end new text begin (3) a commercial vehicle used by a common carrier or rental trucks; new text end new text begin (4) vehicles issued special series plates under section 168.041, subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (5) collector vehicles or motorcycles displaying original plates under section 168.10, subdivision 1g, or 168.105, subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (6) limousines, intercity buses, commuter vans, motor coaches, school buses, or other vehicles designed to transport more than 15 people; new text end new text begin (7) roadable aircraft registered under section 168.24; or new text end new text begin (8) a vehicle issued plates under section 168.25. new text end new text begin (c) An outdoor recreation endorsement is only valid for the specific vehicle being registered. The recreation endorsement sticker is not transferrable between vehicles. Unlawful transfers of an outdoor recreation endorsement are subject to section 168.36. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Replacement. new text end new text begin (a) Vehicles with an outdoor recreation endorsement sticker and transferred by an owner other than by the creation of a security interest or as defined in section 297B.01, subdivision 16, paragraph (c), clauses (1) to (5), must pay the amount required for a new sticker. new text end new text begin (b) The defacement, loss, or destruction of stickers or plates affixed with stickers is governed by section 168.29 and subject to the duplicate replacement fees of section 168.12, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Information required. new text end new text begin On and after May 1, 2026, the commissioner, in coordination with the commissioner of natural resources, must provide information on the department's website about the outdoor recreation endorsement for the general public, including: new text end new text begin (1) access benefits for all Minnesota state parks, state recreation areas, and state waysides larger than 50 acres; new text end new text begin (2) the availability of the endorsement through the typical motor vehicle registration process; and new text end new text begin (3) restrictions on the outdoor recreation endorsement, including eligible vehicles, the inability to transfer endorsement stickers from one vehicle to another, and other frequently asked questions about the endorsement. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin Chapter 13 and section 168.346 apply to data collected, created, received, maintained, or disseminated under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin Fees collected under subdivision 3 must be paid to the commissioner and credited to the outdoor recreation endorsement account in section 85.057. Other fees collected under this section must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.79, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Plate registration stickers. As viewed facing the plates: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end license plates issued to vehicles registered under section 168.017 must display the month of expiration in the lower left corner of each plate and the year of expiration in the lower right corner of each platedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end license plates issued to vehicles registered under section 168.127 must display either fleet registration validation stickers in the lower right corner of each plate or distinctive license plates, issued by the registrar, with "FLEET REG" displayed on the bottom center portion of each platedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end license plates issued after July 1, 2008, requiring validation must display the month of expiration in the lower left corner of each plate and the year of expiration new text begin or the outdoor recreation endorsement sticker provided in section 168.371 new text end in the lower right corner of the plate. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for outdoor recreation endorsements issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705, to the commissioner of public safety to implement the outdoor recreation endorsement established in Minnesota Statutes, section 168.371. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end